Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
143

ANIMALS:
LICENSES AND REGULATIONS

Section

143-1 Definitions

143-2 License required

143-2.5 Regulation of other animals

143-2.6 Animal desertion

143-3 License fee controlled by ordinance

143-4 Issuance of license and tags

143-5 Removal and imitation of dog tags

143-6 Lost dog tags

143-7 Pounds and animal control officers

143-8 Seizure and redemption of unlicensed dogs

143-9 Redemption of dog after sale

143-10 Stray dogs

143-11 Redemption of stray licensed dogs

143-12 Seizure and disposal of diseased dogs;
penalty

143-13 Destruction of diseased or unfit dogs

143-14 Female dogs

143-15 Contracts for seizing and impounding dogs

143-16 Contract between county of Kauai and Kauai
Humane

Society

143-17 Wrongful interference with officers

143-18 Unlawful disposition of impounded dogs

143-19 Penalty

143-20 Reporting of dog or cat captured or killed
in snare

or trap

Note

Chapter title amended
by L 1988, c 270, §1.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next